apertium-quc.quc.twol
Alphabet

  a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z ʼ
  A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z 

  %{n%}:n %{n%}:0
  %{w%}:w %{w%}:0
  %{r%}:r %{r%}:u
  %{a%}:a %{a%}:0
  %{i%}:i %{i%}:0
  %{m%}:m %{m%}:n
  %{o%}:o %{o%}:u
  %{ʼ%}:ʼ %{ʼ%}:0
  %{V%}:e %{V%}:a %{V%}:i %{V%}:o
  %{U%}:o %{U%}:u %{U%}:a
  %{O%}:o %{O%}:u 

  %>:%>
  
;

Sets

Vow = a e i o u ;

ArchiVow = %{o%} ; 

Rules

"Remove beginning and end of token boundaries"
%>:0 <=> _ .#. ;
         .#. _ ; 

"third person possessive"
%{r%}:r <=> _ %>: Vow ;

"w rule"
%{w%}:w <=> _ %>: Vow ;

"a rule"
Vx:0 <=>          _ [ %>: ]+ [ ArchiVow: | :Vow ] ;
          Vow [ %>: ]+ _ ;
     except
          Vow ʼ [ %>: ]+ _ ; ! TODO: Doesn't apply to -i- ?
     where Vx in ( %{a%} %{i%} ) ;

!  k{a}>>{r}>bʼij
!  k0>>u>bʼij


"i rule"
%{i%}:0 <=> i ʼ [ %>: ]+ _ ;

!  x>>kʼojiʼ>{i}k
!  x>>kʼojiʼ>0k

"n rule"
%{n%}:0 <=> _ u: %>: Vow ;

! {n}u>imul
! 0w0imul

! {n}u>chak
! nu0chak

"uw rule"
u:w <=> %{n%}:0 _ %>: Vow ;

!"rule for n/m"
!%{m%}:m <=> _ %>: [b | p];

! k{a}>i{m}bʼe>k
! k00imbʼe0k

!"kki rule"
!%{a%}:0 <=> k _ [ %>: ]+ k %{i%}: ;

! k{a}>>k{i}>kʼayij
! k0>>ki>kʼayij

! k{a}>>k{i}>il
! k0>>k0>il

!"Fusion"
!i:0 <=> k %{a%}: %>: e %>: _ n ; 
!        .#. k %>: %>: _ %{w%}: ;       ! kk'am

! k>e>in>chʼabʼej
! k>e>0n>chʼabʼej


"Glottal insertion in plural"
%{ʼ%}:ʼ <=> _ %>: :Vow ;

! this suffix is -u on root transitives when the root
!vowel is u and -o when the root vowel is not u
"Status marking {O}"
%{O%}:u <=> u [ ? - Vow ]* %> _  ;

!        except 
!              ʼ %>: _ w ; 
!
!"Status marking {O} after glottal"
!%{O%}:0 <=> \b ʼ %>: _ w ;

! ^xetoʼw/<perf><s_pl3>toʼ<v><tv><anti><agfoc>$


! On root transitives, this suffix has the form -V’ at the end of the 
! intonational phrase (-u’ and -o’ in harmony with a preceding u or o 
! and -a’ in the other cases) and -V in other positions.
"Status marking {U}"
%{U%}:Vx <=> Vy [ ? - Vow ]* %>: _ ;
         where Vx in ( u  o )
               Vy in ( u  o ) 
         matched ;
